Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3
ABATEMENT OF PUBLIC NUISANCE

Law reviews:

For article, "Using Local Police Powers to Protect the Environment", see 24

C

olo. Law. 1063 (1995).

16-13-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Action to abate a public nuisance" means any action authorized by this part 3 to restrain, remove, terminate, prevent, abate, or perpetually enjoin a public nuisance.

"Building" means a structure which has the capacity to contain, and is designed for the shelter of, man, animals, or property, including any house, office building, store, warehouse, or structure of any kind, whether or not such building is permanently affixed to the ground upon which it is situate, and any trailer, semitrailer, trailer coach, mobile home, or other vehicle designed or used for occupancy by persons for any purpose.

(2.1) "Conviction" means a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere that is accepted by the court or adjudication for an offense that would constitute a criminal offense if committed by an adult.

(2.2) "Drive-by crime" means a first degree assault as defined in section 18-3-202, C.R.S., second degree assault as defined in section 18-3-203, C.R.S., attempted first degree or second degree assault, felony menacing as defined in section 18-3-206, C.R.S., or illegal discharge of a firearm as defined in section 18-12-107.5, C.R.S., any of which is committed while utilizing a vehicle for means of concealment or transportation.

(2.3) "Instrumental" means a substantial connection exists between the property and the public nuisance act.

(2.4) "Proceeds traceable" or "traceable proceeds" means all property, real and personal, corporeal and incorporeal, which is proceeds attributable to, derived from, or realized through, directly or indirectly, a public nuisance act, whether proved by direct, circumstantial, or documentary evidence. There shall be no requirement of showing a trail of documentary evidence to trace proceeds provided that the standard of proof by clear and convincing evidence is met.

(2.5) "Public nuisance act" means any of the crimes, offenses, or violations set forth in section 16-13-303 (1)(a) to (1)(n), regardless of the location where the act occurred.

(2.6) "Real property" means all lands and franchises and interests in land located within this state, including water rights, mineral rights, oil and gas rights, space rights, condominium rights, and air rights, and any and all other things usually included within said term. "Real property" includes any and all interests in such property less than full title, such as easements, incorporeal hereditaments, and every estate, interest, or right, legal or equitable.

(2.7) "Seizing agency" means any agency that is charged with the enforcement of the laws of this state, of any other state, or of the United States and that has participated in a seizure or has been substantially involved in effecting a forfeiture through the development of evidence underlying the claim for forfeiture or through legal representation pursuant to this part 3. The department of corrections, the division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources, and a multijurisdictional law enforcement task force shall be deemed to be included under this definition.

"Vehicle" means any device of conveyance capable of moving itself or of being moved from place to place upon wheels or track or by water or air, whether or not intended for the transport of persons or property, and includes any place therein adapted for overnight accommodation of persons or animals or for the carrying on of business.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 259, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-301.

L. 73:

p. 236, § 12.

L. 75:

(2) amended, p. 1466, § 7, effective July 18.

L. 81:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 954, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2.5) added, p. 683, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2.3) and (2.7) added, p. 630, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(2.2) added, p. 875, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 92:

(2.3) amended, p. 2171, § 19, effective June 2.

L. 93:

(2.2) amended, p. 969, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2.7) amended, p. 872, § 4, effective May 24.

L. 96:

(2.7) amended, p. 375, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2000:

(2.3) amended, p. 1108, § 5, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(2.1) and (2.4) added and (2.3) and (2.7) amended, p. 916, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2.4) and (2.5) amended and (2.6) added, p. 903, § 14, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2.3) was amended by section 1 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2002, resulting in a new definition being added as subsection (2.3). The former subsection (2.3) was relocated by the same act to subsection (2.4).

16-13-302. Public nuisances - policy.

It is the policy of the general assembly that every public nuisance shall be restrained, prevented, abated, and perpetually enjoined. It is the duty of the district attorney in each judicial district of this state to bring and maintain an action, pursuant to the provisions of this part 3, to restrain, prevent, abate, and perpetually enjoin any such public nuisance and to seek the forfeiture of property as provided in this part 3. The general assembly intends that proceedings under this part 3 be remedial and equitable in nature. Nothing contained in this part 3 shall be construed as an amendment or repeal of any of the criminal laws of this state, but the provisions of this part 3, insofar as they relate to those laws, shall be considered a cumulative right of the people in the enforcement of such laws. The provisions of this part 3 shall not be construed to limit or preempt the powers of any court or political subdivision to abate or control nuisances.

It is also the policy of the general assembly that asset forfeiture pursuant to this part 3 shall be carried out pursuant to the following:

Generation of revenue shall not be the primary purpose of asset forfeiture.

No prosecutor's or law enforcement officer's employment or level of salary shall depend upon the frequency of seizures or forfeitures which such person achieves.

All seizures of real property pursuant to this part 3 shall be made pursuant to a temporary restraining order or injunction based upon a judicial finding of probable cause.

Each seizing agency shall have policies and procedures for the expeditious release of seized property which is not subject to forfeiture pursuant to this part 3, when such release is appropriate.

Each seizing agency retaining forfeited property for official law enforcement use shall ensure that the property is subject to controls consistent with controls which are applicable to property acquired through the normal appropriations process.

Each seizing agency which receives forfeiture proceeds shall conform with reporting, audit, and disposition procedures enumerated in this article.

Each seizing agency shall prohibit its employees from purchasing forfeited property.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 259, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-302.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 630, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 446, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the authority of counties and municipalities to control public nuisances, see § 31-15-401.

16-13-303. Class 1 public nuisance.

Every building or part of a building including the ground upon which it is situate and all fixtures and contents thereof, every vehicle, and any real property shall be deemed a class 1 public nuisance when:

Used as a public or private place of prostitution or used as a place where the commission of soliciting for prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-202, C.R.S.; pandering, as defined in section 18-7-203, C.R.S.; keeping a place of prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-204, C.R.S.; pimping, as defined in section 18-7-206, C.R.S.; or human trafficking, as described in section 18-3-503 or 18-3-504, C.R.S., occurs;

Used, or designed and intended to be used, as gambling premises, as defined in section 18-10-102 (5), C.R.S., or as a place where any gambling device or gambling record, as such terms are defined in section 18-10-102 (3) and (7), C.R.S., is kept;

Used for transporting gambling proceeds, records, or devices as defined in section 18-10-102 (3), (6), and (7), C.R.S.;

Used for unlawful manufacture, cultivation, growth, production, processing, sale, or distribution or for storage or possession for any unlawful manufacture, sale, or distribution of any controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., or any other drug the possession of which is an offense under the laws of this state, or any imitation controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-420 (3), C.R.S.;

Used for unlawful possession of any controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., except for possession of less than sixteen ounces of marijuana;

Used for a purpose declared by a statute of this state to be a class 1 public nuisance;

Used as a place where the commission of theft, as specified in section 18-4-401, C.R.S., occurs;

Used for transporting property which is the subject of theft, as specified in section 18-4-401, C.R.S.;

Used for the unlawful manufacture, sale, or distribution of drug paraphernalia, as defined in section 18-18-426, C.R.S.;

Used for prostitution of a child, as defined in section 18-7-401, C.R.S., or used as a place where the commission of soliciting for child prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-402, C.R.S., pandering of a child, as defined in section 18-7-403, C.R.S., keeping a place of child prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-404, C.R.S., pimping of a child, as defined in section 18-7-405, C.R.S., or inducement of child prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-405.5, C.R.S., occurs;

Used for the sexual exploitation of children pursuant to part 4 of article 6 of title 18, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

Used in violation of section 43-10-114, C.R.S.;

Used in the commission of any felony not otherwise included in this section;

Used in the commission of felony vehicular eluding pursuant to section 18-9-116.5, C.R.S.;

Used in the commission of hit and run with serious bodily injury or death pursuant to section 42-4-1601 (1), (2)(b), and (2)(c), C.R.S.;

Used in committing a drive-by crime, as defined in section 16-13-301 (2.2);

Used, or designed and intended to be used, as gaming premises, or as a place where any gaming device, as the term is defined in section 44-30-103 (13), or gaming record is kept, in violation of article 30 of title 44, or in violation of article 20 of title 18;

Used for transporting adjusted gross proceeds or gaming devices as the terms are defined in section 44-30-103 (1) and (13), or records in violation of the provisions of article 30 of title 44, or in violation of article 20 of title 18;

Used for the unlawful manufacture, production, sale, distribution, or for storage or possession for any unlawful manufacture, sale, or distribution of any gaming device, as defined in section 44-30-103 (13), or any other gaming device, equipment, key, electronic or mechanical device, slot machine, bogus chips, counterfeit chips, cards, coins, gaming billets, cheating device, thieving device, tools, drills, or wires used in violation of article 30 of title 44, or in violation of article 20 of title 18; or

Used in committing, attempting to commit, or conspiring to commit against an elderly person any felony set forth in part 4 of article 4 of title 18, C.R.S., in part 1, 2, 3, or 5 of article 5 of title 18, C.R.S., article 5.5 of title 18, C.R.S., or section 11-51-603, C.R.S. For purposes of this paragraph (n), an "elderly person" means a person sixty years of age or older.

(1.5) All equipment, mechanical systems, or machinery, or parts thereof, shall be deemed to be a class 1 public nuisance at the location of the automatic dialing system when used for soliciting with an automatic dialing system containing a prerecorded message in violation of section 18-9-311 (1), C.R.S.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, all fixtures and contents of any building, structure, vehicle, or real property that is a class 1 public nuisance under subsection (1) of this section and all property that is a class 1 public nuisance under subsection (1.5) of this section are subject to seizure, confiscation, and forfeiture as provided in this part 3. In addition, the personal property of every kind and description, including currency and other negotiable instruments and vehicles, used in conducting, maintaining, aiding, or abetting any class 1 public nuisance is subject to seizure, confiscation, and forfeiture, as provided in this part 3.

Subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply to an owner, operator, employee, or customer of a simulated gambling device, or of a business offering simulated gambling devices, who:

Ceased participating in such activity on or before July 1, 2018; and

Provides clear documentation to the district attorney that:

A lawful contract has been entered into for the sale or transfer of all simulated gambling devices connected with the activity to a person by whom, or into a jurisdiction where, the activity is lawful; and

Consummates the contract by actually selling or transferring the simulated gambling devices within one hundred eighty days after the contract was entered into or after any simulated gambling devices that were seized, confiscated, or forfeited by law enforcement authorities have been returned, whichever occurs later.

The following shall be deemed class 1 public nuisances and be subject to forfeiture and distributed as provided in section 16-13-311 (3), and no property rights shall exist in them:

All currency, negotiable instruments, securities, or other things of value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for any public nuisance act; or

All proceeds traceable to any public nuisance act; or

All currency, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended to be used to facilitate any public nuisance act; or

All equipment of any kind, including but not limited to computers and any type of computer hardware, software, or other equipment, used in committing sexual exploitation of a child, as described in section 18-6-403, or cybercrime, as described in section 18-5.5-102.

Whenever it is established, in an action brought pursuant to this part 3, that a person has received proceeds derived from any public nuisance act, the court shall award to the plaintiff a money judgment of forfeiture for the amount of said proceeds shown to have been derived from any public nuisance act or for an amount shown to have been derived from a series of similar acts which fall within a pattern of public nuisance acts. The person subjected to such a money judgment may claim a setoff equal to the fair market value of the property forfeited if he shows that said property is traceable to the public nuisance act upon which the money judgment is predicated.

In any action seeking forfeiture of property pursuant to this part 3, any person contesting the forfeiture shall establish by a preponderance of the evidence such person's standing as a true owner of the property or a true owner with an interest in the property.

To establish standing, the person shall first prove that the person had a recorded or registered interest in the property, or a bona fide marital interest in the property, prior to title-vesting in the state, if the property is of the type for which interests can be, and customarily are, recorded or registered in a public office.

The person shall also prove that he or she is a true owner of the property or a true owner of an interest in the property. The factors to be considered by the court in determining whether a person is a true owner shall include, but need not be limited to:

Whether the person had the primary use, benefit, possession, or control of the property;

How much of the consideration for the purchase or ownership of the property was furnished by the person, and whether the person furnished reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the property or interest;

Whether the transaction by which the person acquired the property or interest was secret, concealed, undisclosed, hurried, or not in the usual mode of doing business;

Whether the transaction by which the person acquired the property or interest was conducted through the use of a shell, alter ego, nominee, or fictitious party;

Whether the person is a relative, a co-conspirator, complicitor, or an accessory in the public nuisance act or acts or other criminal activity, a business associate in a legal or illegal business, one who maintains a special or close relationship with, or an insider with respect to the perpetrator of the alleged public nuisance act or acts;

Whether the person is silent or fails to call parties to testify or to produce available evidence explaining the acquisition of the property or factors which may be badges of fraud or deceit, or show lack of true ownership;

Whether the timing of the transaction by which the person acquired the property was during the pendency or threat of litigation, or during any time when the person knew, should have known, or had notice of the public nuisance act or acts or the threat of a forfeiture action;

Whether the placing of the title in the name of, or the putative ownership in, or transfer to, the person was done with intent to delay, hinder, or avoid a forfeiture, or for some purpose other than ownership of the property;

Whether the perpetrator of the alleged public nuisance act or acts has absconded or is a fugitive from justice and the conveyance occurred after the flight, or before the flight, in any of the circumstances set forth in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c);

Whether the subject matter property is of a kind in which property or ownership rights can legally exist;

Any other badge or indicia of fraud under article 8 of title 38, C.R.S., or the general law of fraudulent transfers or conveyances.

The court shall consider the totality of the circumstances in determining whether a person is a true owner. A person contesting the forfeiture does not necessarily have to show that all of the factors enumerated in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5) support the claim of true ownership, nor does the person necessarily establish true ownership by showing the absence of fraudulent intent or badges of fraud.

No private sale or conveyance of a used motor vehicle shall be deemed to make a party eligible to assert standing to contest the forfeiture thereof, unless the title to the motor vehicle, with transfer duly executed to the party, has been filed with the division of motor vehicles in the department of revenue prior to the physical seizure of the vehicle and the recording of a notice of seizure, or the party attempting to assert standing has exclusive possession of the vehicle at the time of seizure. A party eligible to assert standing under this paragraph (e) must nevertheless establish that the party is a true owner of the vehicle or has an interest therein pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (5).

Unless the standing of a particular party is conceded in the complaint initiating the public nuisance action, a party must assert standing in the answer and fully describe the party's interest in the property which is the subject matter of the action, and submit a verified statement, supported by any available documentation, of the party's ownership of or interest in the property.

(5.1) (a) In any action to forfeit property pursuant to this part 3, the plaintiff, in addition to any other matter which must be proven in the plaintiff's case in chief, shall prove by clear and convincing evidence that possession of the property is unlawful or that the owner of the property was a party to the creation of the public nuisance. The plaintiff shall also prove by clear and convincing evidence that the property was instrumental in the commission or facilitation of a crime creating a public nuisance or the property constitutes traceable proceeds of the crime or related criminal activity.

The defendant in an action brought pursuant to this part 3 may petition the court to determine whether a forfeiture was constitutionally excessive. Upon the conclusion of a trial resulting in a judgment of forfeiture in an action brought pursuant to this part 3, if the evidence presented raises an issue of proportionality under this paragraph (a.5), the defendant may petition the court to set a hearing, or the court may on its own motion set a hearing, to determine whether a forfeiture was constitutionally excessive. This determination shall be made prior to any sale or distribution of forfeited property.

In making this determination, the court shall compare the forfeiture to the gravity of the public nuisance act giving rise to the forfeiture and related criminal activity.

The defendant shall have the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the forfeiture is grossly disproportional.

If the court finds that the forfeiture is grossly disproportional to the public nuisance act and related criminal activity, it shall reduce or eliminate the forfeiture as necessary to avoid a violation of the excessive fines clause of the eighth amendment of the United States constitution or article II, section 20, of the Colorado constitution.

and (VI) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 889, § 1, effective July 1, 2003.)

As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5.1), an owner was a "party to the creation of the public nuisance" if it is established that:

The owner was involved in the public nuisance act; or

The owner knew of the public nuisance act or had notice of the acts creating the public nuisance or prior similar conduct.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II), if the plaintiff proves by clear and convincing evidence the owner knew or had notice of the public nuisance, the owner must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the owner took reasonable steps to prohibit or abate the unlawful use of the property for the court to find the owner was not a party to the creation of the public nuisance.

(5.2) (a) With respect to a partial or whole ownership interest in existence at the time the conduct constituting a public nuisance took place, "innocent owner" means any owner who:

Did not have actual knowledge of the conduct constituting a public nuisance, or notice of an act or circumstance creating the public nuisance or prior similar conduct, notice being satisfied by, but not limited to, sending notice of an act or circumstance creating the public nuisance by certified mail; or

Upon learning of the conduct constituting a public nuisance, took reasonable action to prohibit such use of the property. An owner may demonstrate that he or she took reasonable action to prohibit the conduct constituting a public nuisance if the owner:

Timely revoked or attempted to revoke permission for the persons engaging in such conduct to use the property; or

Took reasonable action to discourage or prevent the use of the property in conduct constituting a public nuisance.

With respect to a partial or whole ownership interest acquired after the conduct constituting a public nuisance has occurred, "innocent owner" means a person who, at the time he or she acquired the interest in the property, had no knowledge or notice that the illegal conduct subjecting the property to seizure had occurred or that the property had been seized for forfeiture, and:

Acquired an interest in the property in a bona fide transaction for value; or

Acquired an interest in the property through probate or inheritance; or

Acquired an interest in the property through dissolution of marriage or by operation of law.

An innocent owner's interest in property shall not be forfeited under any provision of state law. An innocent owner has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she has an ownership interest in the subject property. Otherwise, the burden of proof under this subsection (5.2) shall be as provided in subsection (5.1) of this section.

A person who is convicted of a criminal offense arising from the same activity giving rise to the forfeiture proceedings in accordance with section

16-13-307

(1.5) shall not be eligible to assert an innocent owner defense.

Whenever clear and convincing evidence adduced in an action pursuant to this part 3 shows a substantial connection between currency and the acts specified in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, a rebuttable presumption shall arise that said currency is property subject to forfeiture. A substantial connection exists if:

Currency in the aggregate amount of one thousand dollars or more was seized at or close to the time that evidence of the acts specified in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section was developed or recovered; and

Said amount of currency was seized on the same premises or in the same vehicle where evidence of said acts was developed or recovered; or

Said amount of currency was seized from the possession or control of a person engaged in said acts; or

Traces of a controlled substance were discovered on the currency or an animal trained in the olfactory detection of controlled substances indicated the presence of the odor of a controlled substance on the currency as testified to by an expert witness.

(6.5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 3 to the contrary, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, only the facts that give rise to the presumption that currency is property subject to forfeiture pursuant to subsection (6) of this section. However, when a preponderance of credible evidence is adduced to rebut a presumption that has arisen pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the burden of proof shall revert to the plaintiff to prove, by clear and convincing evidence, the elements of the plaintiff's case with respect to the currency.

Currency seized pursuant to this part 3 may be placed in an interest-bearing account during the proceedings pursuant to this part 3 if so ordered by the court upon the motion of any party. Photocopies of portions of the bills shall serve as evidence at all hearings. The account and all interest accrued shall be forfeited or returned to the prevailing party in lieu of the currency.

The provisions of subsection (6) of this section shall not be construed so as to limit the introduction of any other competent evidence offered to prove that seized currency is a public nuisance.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 260, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-303.

L. 77:

(1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (2) amended and (1)(e) added, p. 889, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(1)(f) added, p. 472, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 81:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), (1)(f), and (2) amended and (1)(g) to (1)(i) and (3) added, pp. 954, 956, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1; (1)(c) amended, p. 737, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 83:

IP(3) amended, p. 686, § 1, effective April 21; IP(1), (1)(c), and (2) amended, p. 683, § 2, effective July 1; (1)(c) amended, p. 704, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(h), (2), and (3)(a) to (3)(c) amended and (1)(j), (1)(k), and (4) to (8) added, p. 631, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1)(h.5) added, p. 1354, § 1, effective July 1; (1.5) added and (2) amended, p. 346, § 11, effective July 1; (1)(h.6) added, p. 1090, § 2, effective January 1, 1989.

L. 89:

(1)(h.5) repealed, p. 1645, § 18, effective June 5; (1)(l) added, p. 875, § 8, effective June 5.

L. 91:

(1)(m) added, p. 1581, § 5, effective June 4; (1)(h.6) amended, p. 1057, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(m) amended, p. 2171, § 20, effective June 2; (1)(c)(I) and (1)(f) amended, p. 391, § 16, effective July 1; (5) amended and (5.1) and (5.2) added, p. 447, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(k) amended, p. 2551, § 38, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(m)(I) and (1)(m)(II) amended, p. 1110, § 62, effective May 31; (1)(c)(II) amended, p. 463, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3)(d) added, p. 799, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(n) added, p. 1108, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(5.1) and (5.2) amended, p. 917, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(5), (5.1)(a), (5.1)(a.5), (5.1)(b)(II), (5.2)(a)(I), IP(5.2)(b), (5.2)(c), and IP(6) amended and (5.2)(d) and (6.5) added, pp. 898, 889, 902, 896, §§ 10, 1, 12, 6, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(c)(II) amended, (HB 10-1352), ch. 259, p. 1172, § 14, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 12-1151), ch. 174, p. 621, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1)(e)(I) and (1)(e)(II) amended, (HB 13-1160), ch. 373, p. 2200, § 8, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 14-1273), ch. 282, p. 1153, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (HB 18-1234), ch. 381, p. 2298, § 2, effective June 6; (3)(d) amended, (HB 18-1200), ch. 379, p. 2292, § 4, effective August 8; (1)(m) amended, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 238, § 11, October 1.

Editor's note:

Subsections (5.1)(b)(II)(A) and (5.1)(b)(II)(B) were numbered as (5.1)(b)(II) and (5.1)(b)(III), respectively, in HB 02-1404 but were renumbered on revision in 2010 to conform to statutory format.

16-13-304. Class 2 public nuisance.

The following are deemed to be a class 2 public nuisance:

Any place where people congregate, which encourages a disturbance of the peace, or where the conduct of persons in or about that place is such as to annoy or disturb the peace of the occupants of or persons attending such place, or the residents in the vicinity, or the passersby on the public street or highway; or

Any public or private place or premises which encourages professional gambling, unlawful use, sale, or distribution of imitation controlled substances, as defined in section 18-18-420 (3), C.R.S., drugs, controlled substances, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., or other drugs the possession of which is an offense under the laws of this state, furnishing or selling intoxicating liquor to minors, furnishing or selling fermented malt beverages to persons under the age of twenty-one, solicitation for prostitution, or traffic in stolen property; or

Any public or private place or premises used for soliciting by means of a prerecorded message in violation of section 18-9-311 (1), C.R.S.; or

Any public or private place used for a purpose declared to be a class 2 public nuisance by any other statute of this state.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 260, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-304.

L. 81:

(1)(b) amended, p. 737, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1)(b) amended, p. 704, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1)(b.5) added and (1)(c) amended, p. 346, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(b) amended, p. 391, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(b) amended, p. 463, § 6, effective July 1.

16-13-305. Class 3 public nuisance.

The following are a class 3 public nuisance:

The conducting or maintaining of any business, occupation, operation, or activity prohibited by a statute of this state; or

The continuous or repeated conducting or maintaining of any business, occupation, operation, activity, building, land, or premises in violation of a statute of this state; or

Any building, structure, or land open to or used by the general public, the condition of which presents a substantial danger or hazard to public health or safety; or

Any dilapidated building of whatever kind which is unused by the owner, or uninhabited because of deterioration or decay, which condition constitutes a fire hazard, or subjects adjoining property to danger of damage by storm, soil erosion, or rodent infestation, or which becomes a place frequented by trespassers and transients seeking a temporary hideout or shelter; or

Any unlawful pollution or contamination of any surface or subsurface waters in this state, or of the air, or any water, substance, or material intended for human consumption, but no action shall be brought under this paragraph (e) if the state department of public health and environment or any other agencies of state or local government charged by and acting pursuant to statute or duly adopted regulation have assumed jurisdiction by the institution of proceedings on that pollution or contamination. Nothing in this paragraph (e) shall abridge the right of any person to institute a private nuisance action or of any district attorney to institute a public nuisance action under the common law or other statutory law of this state.

Any activity, operation, or condition which, after being ordered abated, corrected, or discontinued by a lawful order of an agency or officer of the state of Colorado, continues to be conducted or continues to exist in violation of:

Any statute of this state;

Any regulation enacted pursuant to the authority of a statute of this state; or

Any condition declared by a statute of this state to be a class 3 public nuisance.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 261, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-305.

L. 94:

(1)(e) amended, p. 2732, § 354, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (1)(e), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

16-13-306. Class 4 public nuisance.

If any person carries on or practices any profession or calling or operates any business required to be licensed by the laws of the state of Colorado without first procuring a license therefor, or carries on or practices such profession or calling or operates such business after the license therefor required by the laws of the state of Colorado has been lawfully canceled or revoked, the carrying on or practicing of such profession or calling, or the operation of such business without a license is a class 4 public nuisance and may be restrained and abated.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 261, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-13-306.

16-13-306.5. Limitations on receipt of forfeiture payments from federal agencies.

A seizing agency or participant in any joint task force or other multijurisdictional collaboration shall accept payment or distribution from a federal agency of all or a portion of any forfeiture proceeds resulting from adoption or a joint task force or other multijurisdictional collaboration only if the aggregate net equity value of the property and currency seized in a case is in excess of fifty thousand dollars and a forfeiture proceeding is commenced by the federal government and relates to a filed criminal case.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed to restrict seizing agencies from collaborating with a federal agency to seize property that the seizing agency has probable cause to believe is the proceeds or instruments of a crime through an intergovernmental joint task force.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1313), ch. 403, p. 2106, § 2, effective August 9.